Wisconsin, session 2025, AB522.
do enact as follows:AB522,11Section 1. 340.01 (43m) (a) and (b) of the statutes are amended to read:AB522,2,32340.01 (43m) (a) Means a coaster, skate board, roller skates, sled, toboggan, 3unicycle, or toy vehicle upon which a person may ride.AB522,2,44(b) Does not include in-line skates, skateboards, or electric scooters.AB522,25Section 2. 340.01 (74p) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB522,2,76340.01 (74p) (e) A person riding upon in-line skates, a skateboard, a horse, or 7a play vehicle.AB522,38Section 3. 346.94 (11) of the statutes is amended to read:AB522,2,129346.94 (11) Towing sleds, etc. No person shall operate any vehicle or 10combination of vehicles upon a highway when such vehicle or combination of 11vehicles is towing any toboggan, sled, skis, bicycle, skates, skateboard, or toy vehicle 12bearing any person.AB522,413Section 4. 346.94 (17) of the statutes is amended to read:AB522,2,1714346.94 (17) In-line skates and skateboards on roadway. (a) A person 15riding upon in-line skates or a skateboard may go upon any roadway under the 16jurisdiction of a local authority, subject to any restrictions specified by municipal 17ordinance enacted under s. 349.235.AB522,2,2018(b) Any person riding upon in-line skates or a skateboard upon any roadway 19shall ride in a careful and prudent manner and with due regard under the 20circumstances for the safety of all persons using the roadway.AB522,3,221(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection or s. 349.235, no 22person riding upon in-line skates or a skateboard may attach the in-line skates or 23skateboard or himself or herself to any vehicle upon a roadway or, except while 1crossing a roadway at a crosswalk, go upon any roadway under the jurisdiction of 2the department.AB522,53Section 5. 348.01 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB522,3,84348.01 (2) (d) “Vehicle for recreational use” includes a bicycle, moped, motor 5bicycle, motorcycle, all-terrain vehicle, utility terrain vehicle, snowmobile, boat, as 6defined in s. 30.50 (2), sailboard, as defined in s. 30.50 (11), personal watercraft, 7electric scooter, or electric personal assistive mobility device, but does not include 8an automobile, motor truck, motor home, play vehicle, skateboard, or in-line skates.AB522,69Section 6. 349.235 of the statutes is amended to read:AB522,3,1410349.235 Authority to restrict use of in-line skates or skateboards on 11roadway. (1) The governing body of any city, town, village, or county may by 12ordinance restrict the use of in-line skates or skateboards on any roadway under its 13jurisdiction. No ordinance may restrict any person from riding upon in-line skates 14or a skateboard while crossing a roadway at a crosswalk.AB522,3,1915(2) The department of natural resources may promulgate rules designating 16roadways under its jurisdiction upon which in-line skates or skateboards may be 17used, except that no rule may permit a person using in-line skates or a skateboard 18to attach the skates or the skateboard or himself or herself to any vehicle upon a 19roadway.AB522,720Section 7. Initial applicability.AB522,3,2221(1) This act first applies to skateboards used on a roadway on the effective 22date of this subsection.AB522,3,2323